Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. LOUIS COUNTY; EXEMPTION FROM PLAT CERTIFICATION.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, St. Louis County is exempt from the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, sections 505.021, subdivision 9, paragraph (d), and 505.04, that each plat contain a certification from a county official that the current year's taxes have been paid and there are no delinquent taxes owed. new text end new text begin (b) This section expires October 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end